Utah statutes.
54-8a-6.   Duties and liabilities of an excavator.

(1)  Damage to an underground facility by an excavator who excavates but fails to comply with Section 54-8a-4, is prima facie evidence that the excavator is liable for any damage caused by the negligence of that excavator.

(2) (a)  An excavator is not liable for a civil penalty under this chapter if the excavator has:

(i)  given proper notice of the proposed excavation as required in this chapter;

(ii)  marked the area of the proposed excavation as required in Section 54-8a-4;

(iii)  complied with Section 54-8a-5.5; and

(iv)  complied with Section 54-8a-7.

(b)  An excavator is liable for damage incurred by an operator if:

(i)  the operator complies with Section 54-8a-5; and

(ii)  the damage occurs within 24 inches of the operator's markings.

